District of Columbia statutes.
8-809

Appeals.

(a)

The hearing examiner’s decision may be appealed within 15 days of the issuance of the decision to the Board of Appeals and Review.

(b)

The parties may appeal a decision of the Board of Appeals and Review within 15 days of the issuance of the decision to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-100, § 10, 33 DCR 781

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2909.